South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5064.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Northeastern Technical College Area Commission SECTION 1.    Section 59-53-510 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-53-510.    There is created the Northeastern Technical College Area Commission which is a body politic and corporate and the governing body of the Northeastern Technical College. The commission consists of fifteen members, three of whom must be qualified electors of Chesterfield County, three of whom must be qualified electors of Marlboro County, and three of whom must be qualified electors of Dillon County. These nine members must be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of a majority of the legislative delegation from the county in which the appointee is a resident for terms of three years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Vacancies must be filled in the manner of the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term only. The superintendents of education from Chesterfield, Dillon, and Marlboro counties are ex officio members of the commission. One of the superintendents of the two school districts of Dillon County shall serve as a member ex officio for a term of two years on a rotating basis. Representation from local industry may have three ex officio members appointed by a majority of the Northeastern Technical College Area legislative delegation consisting of one appointment per county. The industry leaders from Chesterfield, Dillon, and Marlboro counties are ex officio members of the commission and serve at the will of the legislative delegation. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________